District of Columbia statutes.
5-805

Payment of penalties.

Penalties assessed against a member in conditional retirement as provided in § 5-804, shall be treated as a debt owed to the District of Columbia government, pursuant to § 1-629.03, and may be collected by the District of Columbia government, pursuant to § 1-629.04, or by any other means authorized by law.

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 506, 47 DCR 4619
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 3, 62 DCR 485
This section is referenced in § 5-806.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-236 rewrote this section.